Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2151
Appeal; writ of mandamus.

Any person aggrieved by any act, determination, order, or other action of the director pursuant to the Insurance Holding Company System Act may appeal. The appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Any person aggrieved by any failure of the director to act or make a determination required by the Insurance Holding Company System Act may petition the district court of Lancaster County for a writ in the nature of a mandamus or a peremptory mandamus directing the director to act or make such determination forthwith.

Laws 1991, LB 236, § 31.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.